Maine, session 132, LD1184.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3241, sub-§2, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. The office shall assist a municipality with 4,000 or more residents in meeting the
requirements of subsection 5. The assistance must include reimbursement of 90% of
actual expenses incurred by a municipality if collection or reporting of data as required
by subsection 5 is a modification or expansion of municipal activities so as to
necessitate additional expenditures from local revenues.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §3241, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Municipal housing data reporting. By January 31st of each year, a municipality
with 4,000 or more residents shall provide to the office for use in administering the program
an annual report of:
A. Residential building permit applications, including the number of applications
submitted, approved and denied, categorized into single-family, single-family with
accessory dwelling unit, 2-to-4-family and more-than-4-family homes;
B. The number of dwelling units permitted and demolished; and
C. The number of certificates of occupancy or other final approvals of housing units
issued, the number of those housing units affordable to persons or families whose
incomes are 80% or less of the area median income as determined by the Maine State
Housing Authority and the number of those housing units affordable to persons or
families whose incomes are from 81% to 120% of the area median income as
determined by the Maine State Housing Authority.
As used in this subsection, "accessory dwelling unit" has the same meaning as in Title
30-A, section 4301, subsection 1-C.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 1 - 132LR2247(07)

MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Reimbursement - Municipal Housing Data Reporting N533
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to reimburse municipalities with 4,000 or more residents
for the cost of preparing an annual report on certain housing data, including data on
residential building permits, dwelling units permitted and demolished, certificates of
occupancy or other approvals of housing units issued, as well as certain affordability data.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,000 $60,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,000 $60,000
Page 2 - 132LR2247(07)